Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.158

Applicants, licensees, operators—Commission approval for hiring certain persons.

No applicant for a license from, nor licensee of, the commission, nor any operator of any gambling activity, shall, without advance approval of the commission, knowingly permit any person to participate in the management or operation of any activity for which a license from the commission is required or which is otherwise authorized by this chapter if that person:

(1) Has been convicted of, or forfeited bond upon a charge of, or pleaded guilty to, forgery, larceny, extortion, conspiracy to defraud, wilful failure to make required payments or reports to a governmental agency at any level, or filing false reports therewith, or of any similar offense or offenses, or of any crime, whether a felony or misdemeanor involving any gambling activity or physical harm to individuals or involving moral turpitude; or

(2) Has violated, failed, or refused to comply with provisions, requirements, conditions, limitations or duties imposed by this chapter, and any amendments thereto, or any rules adopted by the commission pursuant thereto, or has permitted, aided, abetted, caused, or conspired with another to cause, any person to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or rules of the commission.

[ 1981 c 139 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 139: See note following RCW 9.46.070.